Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.120

Limitation of actions—Tolling.

Any action to enforce a claim for damages under RCW 19.86.090 shall be forever barred unless commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues: PROVIDED, That whenever any action is brought by the attorney general for a violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, except actions for the recovery of a civil penalty for violation of an injunction or actions under RCW 19.86.090, the running of the foregoing statute of limitations, with respect to every private right of action for damages under RCW 19.86.090 which is based in whole or part on any matter complained of in said action by the attorney general, shall be suspended during the pendency thereof.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 26 s 5; 1961 c 216 s 12.]

NOTES:

Action to enforce claim for civil damages under chapter 19.86 RCW must be commenced within six years. Unfair motor vehicles business practices act: RCW 46.70.220.

Limitation of actions: Chapter 4.16 RCW.